Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.320

Fiscal responsibilities of state officers and employees—Civil penalties additional to other penalties.

The civil penalties provided by RCW 43.88.280 through 43.88.320 are in addition to any other penalties which may be provided by law.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 320: See note following RCW 43.88.280.